Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6331.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 803v. (1) The secretary of state shall develop under section 811e and issue under section 811f a fund-raising plate or collector plate recognizing the 75th anniversary of the Chevrolet Corvette. The fund-raising plate or collector plate authorized in this section shall bear an appropriate logo, the design of which General Motors shall submit to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall sell the fund-raising plate or collector plate authorized under this section only until January 31, 2029. (2) The Chevrolet Corvette fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not lapse to the general fund. (3) The secretary of state shall transfer the donation money from the sale of fund-raising plates or collector plates recognizing the 75th anniversary of the Chevrolet Corvette to the state treasurer, who shall credit the donation money to the Chevrolet Corvette fund established under subsection (2). (4) The state treasurer shall disburse money in the fund established under subsection (2) on a quarterly basis to General Motors. (5) The state treasurer shall be the administrator of the fund created in subsection (2) for auditing purposes. (6) Money disbursed to General Motors under this section shall be distributed to eligible nonprofit organizations that are exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.